District of Columbia statutes.
15-914

Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting similar legislation.

Feb. 10, 1996, D.C. Law 11-85, § 2, 42 DCR 6791
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 101, 51 DCR 881
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 85(e), 52 DCR 2638
1981 Ed., § 15-914.
D.C. Law 15-105 substituted “this chapter” for “this act” in two places.
D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “this chapter” for “this subchapter”.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 14 of the Uniform Foreign-Money Claims Act.